North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-02 Parties to Civil Actions [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure and
transferred to other sections of the code]

28-02-01.
Real party in interest to prosecute actions — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 17.

28-02-02.
Action by foreign executor, administrator, or guardian. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

28-02-03.
Action by assignee. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-02-04.
Infant must appear by guardian. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 17.

28-02-05.
Plaintiffs — Who may be. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 20.

28-02-06.
Defendants — Who may be. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 20.

28-02-07.
Joinder in actions for possession of real estate. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 20.

28-02-08.
Parties required to be joined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 19, 23.

28-02-09.
Persons holding unrecorded conveyance need not be made parties, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-02-10.
Persons severally liable — Joinder. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 20.

28-02-11.
Misjoinder and nonjoinder of parties. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 21.

28-02-12.
Substitution of parties upon death. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-13.
Action may proceed between surviving parties, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-14.
Substitution of guardian. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-15.
Substitution on transfer of interest. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-16.
Substitution of successor to public officer. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-17.
Substitution at any stage. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-18.
Action does not abate after verdict. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 25.

28-02-19.
Intervention — When permitted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 24.

28-02-20.
Intervention — Procedure. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 24.

28-02-21.
Intervention by attorney general. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 24.

28-02-22.
Interpleader — Power of court. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 19.

28-02-23.
Interpleader by joinder. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 22.

28-02-24.
Interpleader by substitution. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 22.